apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
<pardef n="occur__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>red</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>red</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ring</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ring</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ring</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
        
    
<pardef n="outbid__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    
<pardef n="r/un__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>uns</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>unning</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>unning</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>unning</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
     
    
<pardef n="outsh/ine__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ine</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ine</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ines</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>one</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>one</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ining</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ining</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ining</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    
<pardef n="sho/ot__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ots</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>oting</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>oting</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>oting</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
  
    
<pardef n="plan__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ned</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ned</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ning</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ning</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ning</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    

                        <e lm="plan"><i>plan</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="run"><i>r</i><par n="r/un__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="run away">  <i>r</i>  <par n="r/un__vblex"/>  <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>  <p>    <l><b/>away</l>    <r><g><b/>away</g></r>  </p></e>
                        <e lm="pin"><i>pin</i> <par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="confer"><i>confer</i> <par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="shoot"><i>sho</i> <par n="sho/ot__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="deter"><i>deter</i> <par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="sin"><i>sin</i> <par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="prefer"><i>prefer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="stir"><i>stir</i> <par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="clutter"><i>clutter</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="scan"><i>scan</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="blur"><i>blur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="char"><i>char</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="spur"><i>spur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="fan"><i>fan</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="shun"><i>shun</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="infer"><i>infer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="rid"><i>rid</i><par n="outbid__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="grin"><i>grin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="shed"><i>shed</i><par n="outbid__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="incur"><i>incur</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="transfer"><i>transfer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="bid"><i>bid</i><par n="outbid__vblex"/></e>
